Wyoming, session 2026, HB0166.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 14-3-301(a)(viii), (xi)(A) and (B),
35-7-1002(a)(xiv), (xxvii)(C) and (E), 35-7-1018(h) by
creating a new paragraph (ii), 35-7-1031(c)(intro),
35-7-1037, 35-7-1040 and 35-7-1049(r)(vi)(D)(I) are amended
to read:

14-3-301. Definitions.
HB0166

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0368

(a) As used in this article:

(viii) "Edible products" means any product
intended for consumption, including but not limited to
baked goods, candies, gummies and liquids, that contains
tetrahydrocannabinol, a controlled substance listed under
W.S. 35-7-1014(d)(xiii) or (xxi) 35-7-1014(d)(xxi),
35-7-1018(h)(ii) or their analogs;

(xi) "Analog" means a substance:

(A) Whose chemical structure is
substantially similar to the chemical structure of a
controlled substance listed under W.S. 35-7-1014(d)(xiii)
or (xxi) 35-7-1014(d)(xxi) or 35-7-1018(h)(ii); or

(B) That has a stimulant, depressant or
hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system that is
substantially similar to or greater than the stimulant,
depressant or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous
system of a controlled substance listed under W.S.
HB0166

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0368
35-7-1014(d)(xiii) or (xxi) 35-7-1014(d)(xxi) or
35-7-1018(h)(ii).

35-7-1002. Definitions.

(a) As used in this act:

(xiv) "Marihuana" "Marijuana" means all parts of
the plant of the genus Cannabis, whether growing or not;
the seed thereof; the resin extracted from any part of the
plant; and every compound, manufacture, salt, derivative,
mixture or preparation of the plant, its seeds or resin. It
does not include the mature stalks of the plant, fiber
produced from the stalks, oil or cake made from the seeds
of the plant, any other compound, manufacture, salt,
derivative, mixture or preparation of the mature stalks
(except the resin extracted therefrom), fiber, oil or cake,
or the sterilized seed of the plant which is incapable of
germination;

(xxvii) "Drug paraphernalia" means all
equipment, products and materials of any kind when used,
advertised for use, intended for use or designed for use
HB0166

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0368
for manufacturing, converting, preparing, packaging,
repackaging, storing, containing, concealing, injecting,
ingesting, inhaling or otherwise introducing into the human
body a controlled substance in violation of this act and
includes:

(C) Separation gins and sifters when used
or advertised for use in removing twigs and seeds from or
in otherwise cleaning or refining marihuana marijuana;

(E) The following objects when used,
advertised for use, intended for use or designed for use in
ingesting, inhaling or otherwise introducing marihuana
marijuana, cocaine, hashish or hashish oil or any other
controlled substance into the human body:

35-7-1018. Substances included in Schedule III.

(h) Hallucinogenic substances:

(ii) Marijuana.

HB0166

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0368
35-7-1031. Unlawful manufacture or delivery;
counterfeit substance; unlawful possession.

(c) Except as provided in W.S. 35-7-1064, it is
unlawful for any person knowingly or intentionally to
possess a controlled substance unless the substance was
obtained directly from, or pursuant to a valid prescription
or order of a practitioner while acting in the course of
his professional practice, or except as otherwise
authorized by this act. With the exception of any drug that
has received final approval from the United States food and
drug administration, including dronabinol as listed in W.S.
35-7-1018(h), and notwithstanding any other provision of
this act, no practitioner shall dispense or prescribe
marihuana marijuana, tetrahydrocannabinol, or synthetic
equivalents of marihuana marijuana or tetrahydrocannabinol.
No prescription or practitioner's order for marihuana
marijuana, tetrahydrocannabinol, or synthetic equivalents
of marihuana marijuana or tetrahydrocannabinol shall be
valid, unless the prescription is for a drug that has
received final approval from the United States food and
drug administration, including dronabinol. Any person who
violates this subsection:
HB0166

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0368

35-7-1037. Probation and discharge of first
offenders.

Whenever any person who has not previously been convicted
of any offense under this act or under any statute of the
United States or of any state relating to narcotic drugs,
marihuana marijuana, or stimulant, depressant, or
hallucinogenic drugs, pleads guilty to or is found guilty
of possession of a controlled substance under W.S.
35-7-1031(c) or 35-7-1033(a)(iii)(B), or pleads guilty to
or is found guilty of using or being under the influence of
a controlled substance under W.S. 35-7-1039, the court,
without entering a judgment of guilt and with the consent
of the accused, may defer further proceedings and place him
on probation upon terms and conditions. Any term of
probation imposed under this section for a felony offense
shall not exceed the maximum term of probation authorized
under W.S. 7-13-302(b). Upon violation of a term or
condition, the court may enter an adjudication of guilt and
proceed as otherwise provided. Upon fulfillment of the
terms and conditions, the court shall discharge the person
and dismiss the proceedings against him. Discharge and
HB0166

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0368
dismissal under this section shall be without adjudication
of guilt and is not a conviction for purposes of this
section or for purposes of disqualifications or
disabilities imposed by law upon conviction of a crime,
including the additional penalties imposed for second or
subsequent convictions under W.S. 35-7-1038. There may be
only one (1) discharge and dismissal under this section
with respect to any person. This section shall not be
construed to provide an exclusive procedure. Any other
procedure provided by law relating to suspension of trial
or probation, may be followed, in the discretion of the
trial court.

35-7-1040. Planting, cultivating or processing
marijuana, peyote or opium poppy.

Any person who knowingly or intentionally plants,
cultivates, harvests, dries, or processes any marihuana
marijuana, peyote, or opium poppy except as otherwise
provided by law shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall
be punished by imprisonment not to exceed six (6) months in
the county jail or by a fine not to exceed one thousand
dollars ($1,000.00), or both.
HB0166

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0368

35-7-1049. Forfeitures and seizures generally;
property subject to forfeiture.

(r) When property is forfeited under this act, the
commissioner may:

(vi) Authorize any law enforcement officer to
apply to the district court with jurisdiction for an order
providing for destruction of the contraband controlled
substances or paraphernalia if no longer necessary for
evidentiary purposes, provided, however, that a district
court order shall not be necessary for the division of
criminal investigation to destroy quantities of contraband
controlled substances after the division has tested random
samples. The division of criminal investigation shall
adopt rules necessary to operate a program to destroy bulk
quantities of contraband controlled substances, which shall
include:

(D) The additional retention of:

HB0166

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0368
(I) Five (5) ounces of organic
material if the controlled substance is marihuana marijuana
or a substance of similar organic composition;

Section 2. The commissioner of drugs and substance
control shall promulgate rules to necessary to implement
this act.

Section 3. W.S. 35-7-1014(d)(xiii) is repealed.

Section 4. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0166